Hawaii statutes.
§653-7 Service on garnishee. Service
of the copy upon the garnishee may be made in any of the manners here
described, namely:

(1) If the garnishee lives or has an office in the
district in which process is issued, by the officer's handing a copy to the
garnishee in person or leaving it in the garnishee's office in charge of some
deputy or clerk or other employees or attache of the office; or

(2) If the garnishee lives in a district other than
that in which the process was issued, by an officer's handing a copy to the
garnishee in person, or by mailing it in a sealed envelope, registered or
certified, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, and addressed to the
garnishee's home or business address. [L 1890, c 50, §5; RL 1925, §2850; RL
1935, §4296; RL 1945, §10327; am L 1955, c 197, §2; RL 1955, §238-7; HRS
§653-7; gen ch 1985; am L 1992, c 82, §4]

Case Notes

Disbursing officer of senate may be held as garnishee. 10 H.
260.

Auditor, unless within exceptions, is properly a garnishee
for purpose of sequestering salary of territorial employee. 33 H. 602.

Cited: 34 H. 328, 330.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next